Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5750YH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 2139 Section 1. Section 321.279, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. The driver of a motor vehicle commits 3 aggravated eluding if the driver violates subsection 1 and, 4 while being pursued by a peace officer within the state, 5 knowingly crosses the state border into another state without 6 yielding to the pursuing peace officer. A driver violating 7 this subsection is, upon conviction, guilty of a class âDâ 8 felony. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 804.7C Interstate eluding. 10 1. A peace officer of this state who is in fresh pursuit 11 of a driver of a motor vehicle believed to be committing, or 12 having committed, eluding or aggravated eluding under section 13 321.279 may continue the pursuit of the driver into another 14 state and may arrest the driver in that state, subject to the 15 laws of the state in which the arrest occurs. 16 2. For purposes of this section, fresh pursuit does not 17 require immediate or continuous visual contact but requires 18 pursuit without unreasonable delay. 19 3. An arrest under this section shall be reported promptly 20 to the appropriate authorities of the state in which the arrest 21 occurs, and the driver arrested shall be subject to extradition 22 under chapter 820. 23